Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.02.040

Certification of ordinance—Transcript of record to secretary of state.

When one or more ordinances are passed under RCW 35A.02.020 or 35A.02.030, as now or hereafter amended, the clerk of the city or town shall forward to the secretary of state a certified copy of any such ordinance. Upon the filing in the office of the secretary of state of a certified copy of an ordinance adopting the classification of noncharter code city, such city or town shall thereafter be classified as a noncharter code city; except that if there is also filed with the secretary of state a certified copy of an ordinance providing for reorganization of the municipal government of such city or town under a different general plan of government, such reclassification and reorganization shall not be effective until the election, qualification, and assumption of office under RCW 35A.02.050 as now or hereafter amended of at least a quorum of all new officers under the plan of government so adopted.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 18 s 6; 1970 ex.s. c 52 s 1; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.02.040.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 18: See note following RCW 35A.01.070.